nb: Type kaffekverntilbehør: Justeringsknapp; Antistatisk enhet; Burr-sett; Kalibreringsverktøy; Rengjøringsbørste; Rengjøringstabletter; Doseringskopp; Kvernstativ; Beskytter av begrunnelse; Beholder; Bankeboks; Portafilterholder; Skruesett; Tetning eller pakning; Annet
ja: コーヒーミルのアクセサリーの種類: 調整ノブ; 静電気防止デバイス; バーセット; 校正ツール; クリーニングブラシ; 洗浄タブレット; 計量カップ; グラインダースタンド; グラウンズ容器; ホッパー; ノックボックス; ポルタフィルターホルダー; ネジセット; シールまたはガスケット; その他
nl: Type koffiemolenaccessoire: Afstelknop; Antistatisch apparaat; Burr-set; Kalibratiemiddel; Schoonmaakborstel; Reinigingstabletten; Doseerbeker; Molenstandaard; Opvangbak voor koffiedik; Bonenreservoir; Uitklopbak; Portafilterhouder; Schroefset; Afdichting of pakking; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta pribora za mlinac za kavu: Gumb za podešavanje; Antistatički uređaj; Set koničnih noževa; Alat za kalibraciju; Četka za čišćenje; Tablete za čišćenje; Mjerna čašica; Stalak za mljevenje; Spremnik za talog; Spremnik za zrna; Posuda za talog; Držač portafiltra; Set vijaka; Brtva; Ostalo
el: Τύπος αξεσουάρ μύλου καφέ: Κουμπί ρύθμισης; Αντιστατική διάταξη; Σετ μαχαιριών (burr); Εργαλείο βαθμονόμησης; Βούρτσα καθαρισμού; Ταμπλέτες καθαρισμού; Δοσομετρικό κύπελλο; Βάση μύλου; Δοχείο αλεσμένου καφέ; Χοάνη; Δοχείο απόρριψης υπολειμμάτων (knock box); Βάση portafilter; Σετ βιδών; Στεγανοποιητικός δακτύλιος ή φλάντζα; Άλλο
pl: Typ akcesorium do młynka do kawy: Pokrętło regulacyjne; Urządzenie antystatyczne; Zestaw żaren; Narzędzie kalibracyjne; Szczotka do czyszczenia; Tabletki czyszczące; Miarka dozująca; Podstawa pod młynek; Pojemnik na fusy; Zbiornik na ziarna; Pojemnik na fusy (knock box); Uchwyt na kolbę; Zestaw śrub; Uszczelka; Pozostałe
en: Coffee grinder accessory type: Adjustment knob; Anti-static device; Burr set; Calibration tool; Cleaning brush; Cleaning tablets; Dosing cup; Grinder stand; Grounds container; Hopper; Knock box; Portafilter holder; Screw set; Seal or gasket; Other
zh-TW: 咖啡磨豆機配件類型: 調節旋鈕; 防靜電裝置; 刀盤組; 校準工具; 清潔刷具; 清潔錠; 劑量杯; 磨豆機支架; 咖啡渣容器; 料斗; 敲渣桶; 沖煮把手架; 螺絲組; 密封件或墊片; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de acessório para moedor de café: Botão de ajuste; Dispositivo antiestático; Lâminas de moedor; Ferramenta de calibração; Escova de limpeza; Pastilhas de limpeza; Copo dosador; Suporte para moedor; Recipiente de pó de café; Funil; Recipiente para borra; Suporte para porta-filtro; Conjunto de parafusos; Vedação ou junta; Outro
ru: Тип аксессуара для кофемолки: Регулировочная ручка; Антистатическое устройство; Набор жерновов; Инструмент для калибровки; Щетка для чистки; Чистящие таблетки; Мерный стакан; Подставка для кофемолки; Контейнер для гущи; Емкость для кофе; Контейнер для отходов; Держатель портафильтра; Комплект винтов; Уплотнение или прокладка; Другое
da: Tilbehørstype til kaffekværn: Justeringsknap; Antistatisk enhed; Sæt med blade (burr); Kalibreringsværktøj; Rengøringsbørste; Rengøringstabletter; Doseringskop; Kværnstativ; Beholder til grums; Tragt; Knockbox; Portafilterholder; Skruesæt; Pakning eller tætning; Andet
zh-CN: 咖啡研磨机配件类型: 调节旋钮; 防静电装置; 刀盘组; 校准工具; 清洁刷; 清洁片; 剂量杯; 研磨机支架; 咖啡粉盒; 料斗; 敲渣盒; 手柄支架; 螺丝套装; 密封圈或垫圈; 其他
de: Typ für Kaffeemühlenzubehör: Einstellknopf; Antistatisches Gerät; Frässatz; Kalibrierungswerkzeug; Reinigungsbürste; Reinigungstabletten; Dosierbecher; Mahlständer; Bodencontainer; Trichter; Klopfkasten; Siebträgerhalter; Schraubensatz; Dichtung oder Dichtungsring; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatka za mlinček za kavo: Nastavitveni gumb; Antistatična naprava; Komplet brusnih rezil; Orodje za umerjanje; Krtača za čiščenje; Čistilne tablete; Merilna skodelica; Stojalo za mlinček; Posoda za usedlino; Lijak; Knock box; Držalo za prenosni filter; Komplet vijakov; Tesnilo; Druga
lt-LT: Kavamalės priedo tipas: Reguliavimo rankenėlė; Antistatinis įrenginys; Girnų rinkinys; Kalibravimo įrankis; Valymo šepetėlis; Valymo tabletės; Dozavimo puodelis; Šlifuoklio stovas; Tirščių konteineris; Bunkeris; Kavos tirščių iškratymo dėžutė; Portafiltro laikiklis; Varžtų rinkinys; Sandariklis arba tarpinė; Kita
sv: Typ av tillbehör till kaffekvarn: Justerratt; Antistatisk enhet; Malverk; Kalibreringsverktyg; Rengöringsborste; Rengöringstabletter; Doseringskopp; Kvarnställ; Kaffepulverbehållare; Kaffebehållare; Knockbox; Portafilterhållare; Skruvset; Packning; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип аксесоар за кафемелачка: С копче за регулиране; С антистатично устройство; Комплект Burr; Инструмент за калибриране; Четка за почистване; Таблетки за почистване; Дозираща чашка; Стойка за мелачка; Контейнер за утайка; Бункер; Кутия за утайка; Стойка за портафилтър; Комплект винтове; Уплътнение или гарнитура; Друго
fr: Type d’accessoire pour moulin à café: Bouton de réglage; Dispositif antistatique; Jeu de meules; Outil d’étalonnage; Brosse de nettoyage; Pastilles de nettoyage; Gobelet doseur; Support de moulin; Récipient à mouture; Trémie; Boîte à marc; Porte-filtres; Jeu de vis; Joint ou garniture; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório para moinho de café: Botão de ajuste; Dispositivo antiestático; Conjunto de rebarbas; Ferramenta de calibração; Escova de limpeza; Pastilhas de limpeza; Copo doseador; Suporte para moinho; Recipiente para borra de café; Recipiente de grãos; Caixa de depósito de borra; Suporte para portafiltro; Conjunto de parafusos; Vedação ou junta; Outro
tr: Kahve öğütücü aksesuar tipi: Ayar düğmesi; Antistatik cihaz; Öğütme dişlisi seti; Kalibrasyon aracı; Temizleme fırçası; Temizlik tabletleri; Ölçü kabı; Öğütücü standı; Öğütülmüş kahve haznesi; Hazne; Atık kahve kutusu; Portafilter tutucu; Vida seti; Conta veya conta halkası; Diğer
cs: Typ příslušenství mlýnku na kávu: Nastavovací knoflík; Antistatické zařízení; Sada mlecích kamenů; Kalibrační nástroj; Kartáček na čištění; Čisticí tablety; Odměrka; Stojan na mlýnek; Nádoba na sedlinu; Násypka; Odklepávač na kávu; Držák portafilteru; Sada šroubů; Těsnění / těsnicí kroužek; Jiné
vi: Loại phụ kiện máy xay cà phê: Núm điều chỉnh; Thiết bị chống tĩnh điện; Bộ lưỡi xay; Công cụ hiệu chuẩn; Cọ vệ sinh; Viên vệ sinh máy; Cốc đong cà phê; Chân đế máy xay; Hộp đựng bã cà phê; Phễu; Thùng đập bã cà phê; Giá đỡ tay cầm pha cà phê; Bộ ốc vít; Gioăng hoặc vòng đệm; Khác
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องบดกาแฟ: ปุ่มปรับความละเอียดการบด; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันไฟฟ้าสถิต; ชุดเฟืองบดกาแฟ; เครื่องมือปรับเทียบ; แปรงทำความสะอาด; เม็ดทำความสะอาด; ถ้วยตวงผงกาแฟ; แท่นวางเครื่องบด; ภาชนะเก็บกากกาแฟ; โถใส่เมล็ดกาแฟ; กล่องเคาะกากกาแฟ; ที่แขวนด้ามชงกาแฟ; ชุดสกรู; ซีลหรือปะเก็นยาง; อื่นๆ
fi: Kahvimyllyn lisävarusteen tyyppi: Säätönuppi; Antistaattinen laite; Burr-sarja; Kalibrointityökalu; Puhdistusharja; Puhdistustabletit; Annostelukuppi; Kahvimyllyn alusta; Kahvinporojen säilytysastia; Suppilo; Knock box; Portafilter-pidike; Ruuvisarja; Tiiviste; Muu
es: Tipo de accesorio para molinillo de café: Perilla de ajuste; Dispositivo antiestático; Juego de rebabas; Herramienta de calibración; Cepillo de limpieza; Pastillas de limpieza; Vaso dosificador; Soporte para moledor; Contenedor de café molido; Tolva; Recipiente para poso de café; Portafiltros; Juego de tornillos; Sello o junta; Otros
ro-RO: Tip de accesoriu pentru râșnița de cafea: Buton de reglare; Dispozitiv antielectrostatic; Set de piatră de măcinat; Instrument de calibrare; Perie de curățare; Tablete de curățare; Recipient de dozare; Suport pentru râșniță; Recipient pentru zaț; Pâlnie; Recipient pentru lovire; Suport pentru portfiltru; Set șuruburi; Garnitură sau etanșare; Altele
it: Tipo di accessorio per macinacaffè: Manopola di regolazione; Dispositivo antistatico; Set di frese; Strumento di calibrazione; Spazzola per la pulizia; Compresse detergenti; Tazza dosatrice; Supporto per smerigliatrice; Contenitore per fondi; Tramoggia; Raccoglitore per fondi; Supporto portafiltro; Set di viti; Guarnizione o sigillo; Altro
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva mlynčeka na kávu: Nastavovací gombík; Antistatické zariadenie; Súprava mlecích kameňov; Kalibračný nástroj; Čistiaca kefka; Čistiace tablety; Dávkovacia odmerka; Stojan na mlynček; Nádoba na usadeniny; Násypný zásobník; Oklepávač; Držiak portafiltra; Sada skrutiek; Tesnenie alebo tesniaca manžeta; Iné
ko: 커피 그라인더 액세서리 유형: 조절 손잡이; 정전기 방지 장치; 버 세트; 교정 도구; 청소 브러시; 세정 태블릿; 계량컵; 그라인더 스탠드; 그라운드 컨테이너; 호퍼; 노크 박스; 포타필터 홀더; 나사 세트; 씰 또는 개스킷; 기타
hu: Kávédaráló tartozék típusa: Beállító gomb; Antisztatikus eszköz; Örlőkészlet; Kalibrációs eszköz; Tisztítókefe; Tisztítótabletták; Adagolópohár; Darálóállvány; Zacctartály; Tölcsér; Zacctároló; Filtertartó; Csavarkészlet; Tömítés vagy tömítőgyűrű; Egyéb